Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1019.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1792XC (1) 91 th/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321.438, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. a. A person shall not operate on the highway a motor 3 vehicle equipped with a front windshield, a side window to the 4 immediate right or left of the driver, or a sidewing forward 5 of and to the left or right of the driver which is excessively 6 dark or reflective so that it is difficult for a person outside 7 the motor vehicle to see into the motor vehicle through the 8 windshield, window, or sidewing that meets a minimum standard 9 of transparency of less than thirty-five percent light 10 transmittance . 11 a. The department shall adopt rules establishing a minimum 12 measurable standard of transparency which shall apply to 13 violations of this subsection . 14 b. This subsection does not apply to a person who operates 15 a motor vehicle owned or leased by a federal, state, or local 16 law enforcement agency if the operation is part of the personâs 17 official duties. 18